ja: ジッパーテープ素材: コットン; コットンブレンド; ナイロン; ポリエステル; ポリエステルブレンド; その他
en: Zipper tape material: Cotton; Cotton blend; Nylon; Polyester; Polyester blend; Other
fr: Matériau de la bande de fermeture à glissière: Coton; Mélange de coton; Nylon; Polyester; Mélange de polyester; Autre
hu: Cipzárpánt anyaga: Pamut; Pamutkeverék; Nejlon; Poliészter; Poliészterkeverék; Egyéb
pt-PT: Material da fita do fecho de correr: Algodão; Mistura de algodão; Nylon; Poliéster; Mistura de poliéster; Outro
sl-SI: Material traku zadrge: Bombaž; Mešanica bombaža; Najlon; Poliester; Mešanica poliestra; Drugo
lt-LT: Užtrauktuko juostos medžiaga: Medvilnė; Medvilnės mišinys; Nailonas; Poliesteris; Poliesterio mišinys; Kita
fi: Vetoketjun nauhan materiaali: Puuvilla; Puuvillasekoite; Nailon; Polyesteri; Polyesterisekoite; Muu
de: Material des Reißverschlussbands: Baumwolle; Baumwollmischung; Nylon; Polyester; Polyestermischung; Sonstige
pl: Materiał taśmy zamka błyskawicznego: Bawełna; Mieszanka bawełny; Nylon; Poliester; Mieszanka poliestru; Inne
zh-CN: 拉链带材质: 棉质; 棉混纺; 尼龙; 聚酯纤维; 聚酯纤维混纺; 其他
es: Material de la cinta de la cremallera: Algodón; Mezcla de algodón; Nailon; Poliéster; Mezcla de poliéster; Otro
ro-RO: Material al benzii fermoarului: Bumbac; Amestec de bumbac; Nailon; Poliester; Amestec de poliester; Altele
ru: Материал тесьмы молнии: Хлопок; Смесь хлопка; Нейлон; Полиэстер; Смесь полиэстера; Другая
hr-HR: Materijal trake patentnog zatvarača: Pamuk; Mješavina pamuka; Najlon; Poliester; Mješavina poliestera; Ostalo
vi: Chất liệu băng vải của khóa kéo: Cotton; Vải pha cotton; Nylon; Polyester; Vải pha polyester; Khác
nl: Tapemateriaal rijtssluiting: Katoen; Katoenmix; Nylon; Polyester; Polyestermix; Overig
bg-BG: Материал на лентата на ципа: Памук; Памучна смес; Найлон; Полиестер; Полиестерна смес; Други
zh-TW: 拉鍊帶材質: 棉; 棉混紡; 尼龍; 聚酯纖維; 聚酯纖維混紡; 其他
sv: Material i dragkedjeband: Bomull; Bomullsblandning; Nylon; Polyester; Polyesterblandning; Övrigt
da: Materiale i lynlåsbånd: Bomuld; Bomuldsblanding; Nylon; Polyester; Polyesterblanding; Andet
sk-SK: Materiál zipsovej pásky: Bavlna; Zmes bavlny; Nylon; Polyester; Zmes polyesteru; Iné
ko: 지퍼 테이프 소재: 면; 면 혼방; 나일론; 폴리에스터; 폴리에스터 혼방; 기타
nb: Materiale i glidelåstape: Bomull; Bomullsblanding; Nylon; Polyester; Polyesterblanding; Annet
el: Υλικό ταινίας φερμουάρ: Βαμβάκι; Βαμβακερό μείγμα; Νάιλον; Πολυεστέρας; Μείγμα πολυεστέρα; Άλλο
tr: Fermuar şerit malzemesi: Pamuk; Pamuk karışımı; Naylon; Polyester; Polyester karışımı; Diğer
cs: Materiál pásky zipu: Bavlna; Směs bavlny; Nylon; Polyester; Směs polyesteru; Jiné
it: Materiale del nastro della cerniera: Cotone; Misto cotone; Nylon; Poliestere; Misto poliestere; Altro
pt-BR: Material da fita do zíper: Algodão; Mistura de algodão; Nylon; Poliéster; Mistura de poliéster; Outros
th: วัสดุที่ใช้ทำเทปซิป: ฝ้าย; ผ้าฝ้ายผสม; ไนลอน; โพลีเอสเตอร์; โพลีเอสเตอร์ผสม; อื่นๆ